North Carolina, session 2025, HB1093.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Natural and Cultural Resources the sum of three million one hundred thousand dollars
($3,100,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to the Museum
of Life and Science to be used for the Mike Woodard Lab and the exhibit Living Tools,
showcasing North Carolina's biotech achievements and promoting interest in STEM careers.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1093-v-1*